Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1107.04
Director of Administrative Services; books and records; open to inspection.

All the books, papers, letters and transactions pertaining to the office of Director of Administrative Services shall be open to the inspection of a committee of the Legislature, which shall examine and settle all the director's accounts.

R.S.1866, c. 4, § 14, p. 24;

R.S.1913, § 5555;

C.S.1922, § 4857;

C.S.1929, § 84-313;

R.S.1943, § 84-313;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 84-313.